District of Columbia statutes.
50-1507.07

Rules.

Within 90 days after enactment of this subchapter, the Mayor shall issue rule to implement and enforce the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Sept. 5, 1997, D.C. Law 12-14, § 9, 44 DCR 3620
1981 Ed., § 40-127.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 540-1507.01.
Resolution 16-352, the “International Registration Plan Enforcement Rulemaking Disapproval Resolution of 2005”, was approved effective November 1, 2005.